Louisiana, session 2026, HB46.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5554(X) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5554. Group insurance; kinds; amounts; subrogation
* * *
X.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection D of this Section, the
sheriff of DeSoto Parish shall pay out of the sheriff's general fund the premium costs
of group insurance for any retired sheriff and any retired deputy sheriff who retired
from the DeSoto Parish Sheriff's Office as follows:
(1) (a) One hundred percent of the premium costs of group hospital, surgical,
medical expense, and dental insurance, and the first ten thousand dollars of life
insurance contracted for under the provisions of this Section if the sheriff or deputy
sheriff retired with thirty years or more of creditable service with the sheriff's office
of DeSoto Parish.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 46 ENROLLED
(2) (b) Seventy-five percent of the premium costs of group hospital, surgical,
medical expense, and dental insurance, and the first ten thousand dollars of life
insurance contracted for under the provisions of this Section if the sheriff or deputy
sheriff retired with twenty-five years of creditable service with the sheriff's office of
DeSoto Parish.
(3) (c) Fifty percent of the premium costs of group hospital, surgical,
medical expense, and dental insurance, and the first ten thousand dollars of life
insurance contracted for under the provisions of this Section if the sheriff or deputy
sheriff retired with twenty years of creditable service with the sheriff's office of
DeSoto Parish.
(4) (d) The provisions of Paragraphs Subparagraphs (1) (a) through (3) (c)
and this Paragraph of this Subsection Paragraph shall apply only to persons hired by
the DeSoto Parish Sheriff's Office on or after January 1, 2009, and who subsequently
retire retired from the DeSoto Parish Sheriff's Office before January 1, 2026.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection D of this Section, the
sheriff of DeSoto Parish shall pay out of the sheriff's general fund the premium costs
of group insurance for any retired sheriff and any retired deputy sheriff who retired
from the DeSoto Parish Sheriff's Office as follows:
(a) One hundred percent of the premium costs of group hospital, surgical,
medical expense, and dental insurance, and the first ten thousand dollars of life
insurance contracted for under the provisions of this Section if the sheriff or deputy
sheriff retired with twenty years or more of creditable service with the sheriff's office
of DeSoto Parish.
(b) Fifty percent of the premium costs of group hospital, surgical, medical
expense, and dental insurance, and the first ten thousand dollars of life insurance
contracted for under the provisions of this Section if the sheriff or deputy sheriff
retired with fifteen years or more of creditable service with the sheriff's office of
DeSoto Parish.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 46 ENROLLED
(c) The provisions of Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this Paragraph shall apply
only to persons hired by the DeSoto Parish Sheriff's Office on or after January 1,
2009, and who subsequently retire from the DeSoto Parish Sheriff's Office.
(5) (3) The provisions of Paragraph (G)(1) of this Section shall apply to all
persons hired before January 1, 2009.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.